docker/elastic/sk/hunspell/sk_SK/sk_SK.dic
Absolón/c
Addisabebčan/c
Adrián/c
agronóm/c
Achilles/c
Alah/c
Albert/c
alergiológ/c
Alexander/c
Alfonz/c
Aljašťan/c
Ambróz/c
Amos/c
Anakreón/c
anestéziológ/c
Angloameričan/c
Anton/c
apík/c
apo/c
archeológ/c
Arnold/c
Arpád/c
astronóm/c
Aténčan/c
Atlas/c
Aurel/c
Ázijčan/c
back/c
báčik/c
báčino/c
Bahamčan/c
bakteriológ/c
Banskobystričan/c
baťko/c
Belo/c
benjamín/c
Bernard/c
bezzemok/c
bibliofil/c
biológ/c
Blažej/c
boh/c
Bohdan/c
Bohumil/c
Bohuslav/c
bojko/c
Bolívijčan/c
Bonifác/c
bos/c
bôžik/c
Branislav/c
brat/c
bratovrah/c
Brňan/c
Budapešťan/c
budovateľ/c
Bush/c
cár/c
Celzius/c
ciciačik/c
corgonisko/c
ctiteľ/c
cvok/c
Cyperčan/c
Cyril/c
Černobyľčan/c
Číňan/c
človiečik/c
Dalibor/c
Daniel/c
David/c
ded/c
dedinčan/c
dedo/c
defektológ/c
demagóg/c
Demostenes/c
Dezider/c
Diogenes/c
dobráčisko/c
Dobroslav/c
dodávateľ/c
dokončovateľ/c
Dolnosúčan/c
don/c
dorábateľ/c
doručovateľ/c
Drahoslav/c
dražiteľ/c
drotárik/c
držiteľ/c
Dublinčan/c
ďuro/c
dvoran/c
Edmund/c
Egypťan/c
Einstein/c
ekonóm/c
Emanuel/c
emir/c
Eneas/c
Erik/c
Eros/c
Etiópčan/c
etymológ/c
Euklides/c
Európan/c
Faerčan/c
Falklanďan/c
fanúšik/c
farmakológ/c
Félix/c
Ferdinand/c
Fidžijčan/c
Filip/c
financovateľ/c
fiťfiriť/c
Florián/c
fonológ/c
František/c
Frederik/c
Fridrich/c
futurológ/c
Gabončan/c
Gabriel/c
Galapágčan/c
Gambijčan/c
gašparko/c
gazdíček/c
Gdynčan/c
genealóg/c
geológ/c
George/c
gerontológ/c
Gibraltárčan/c
Gniezňan/c
Göteborgčan/c
Granaďan/c
Gregor/c
Grónčan/c
Guinejčan/c
Guyančan/c
Haagčan/c
hadži/c
Haiťan/c
Haličan/c
hanobiteľ/c
Hararčan/c
Havančan/c
Hebrončan/c
Helsinčan/c
Henrich/c
herkules/c
Hermes/c
hlásateľ/c
hodnotiteľ/c
holobriadok/c
Horácius/c
Hornorakúšan/c
Hospodin/c
hrbáčik/c
hubiteľ/c
hydrológ/c
chirurg/c
chlapisko/c
chmuľko/c
Chorzowčan/c
chruňo/c
chudáčisko/c
Ignác/c
ichtyológ/c
Imrich/c
Indoeurópan/c
Izák/c
Izraelčan/c
Jamajčan/c
Ján/c
Janovčan/c
Jarolím/c
Jaroslav/c
jašo/c
jedináčik/c
Ježiš/c
Jób/c
Jozef/c
Juraj/c
Kain/c
kamarátko/c
Kanaďan/c
Karamanlis/c
Karol/c
Kazimír/c
Kiribatčan/c
klasik/c
kmeť/c
kmotrík/c
Koloman/c
Konštantín/c
Kórejčan/c
Kornel/c
Košičan/c
krajan/c
Kréťan/c
Kristus/c
Krivorožan/c
krstiteľ/c
Kualalumpurčan/c
kubo/c
kuli/c
kutil/c
kynológ/c
laganisko/c
ľaľo/c
lapajisko/c
Leningradčan/c
Lesothačan/c
lexikológ/c
Libérijčan/c
Líbyjčan/c
Liežan/c
Limčan/c
Lipčan/c
Litomyšľan/c
Litvan/c
lodivod/c
Lombarďan/c
Londýnčan/c
Louis/c
Ľubomír/c
Ľuboslav/c
ľudomil/c
Ľudovít/c
lumpisko/c
Luxemburčan/c
macko/c
Madridčan/c
Magdeburčan/c
Majerčan/c
majordóm/c
majstrík/c
Malawijčan/c
Malijčan/c
maloodberateľ/c
malospotrebiteľ/c
Managujčan/c
Manilčan/c
Marcel/c
Marián/c
Mário/c
Maročan/c
Marseillčan/c
Martin/c
Matúš/c
Maximilián/c
Medard/c
Mefistofeles/c
Melbournčan/c
metalurg/c
Metod/c
Mezopotámčan/c
Michal/c
Mikronézan/c
miláčik/c
Milánčan/c
milosťpánko/c
mím/c
Minčan/c
Miroslav/c
Mjanmarčan/c
mladíček/c
Mníchovčan/c
Modran/c
Mojmír/c
Monačan/c
Montevidejčan/c
Moravan/c
Morse/c
moslim/c
mučiteľ/c
muzeológ/c
muž/c
mužík/c
mysliteľ/c
nadčlovek/c
nadobúdateľ/c
naháčik/c
nakladateľ/c
Nantesan/c
napodobňovateľ/c
Napoleon/c
narušiteľ/c
nasledovateľ/c
Navarrčan/c
navštevovateľ/c
nebešťan/c
nečlen/c
Nepálčan/c
Neptún/c
neurológ/c
neznaboh/c
ničiteľ/c
Nikaragujčan/c
Nitran/c
Norimberčan/c
nováčik/c
Novosadčan/c
nuncius/c
obdivovateľ/c
objaviteľ/c
obnovovateľ/c
obyvateľ/c
ocino/c
oco/c
Odesan/c
odosielateľ/c
odronisko/c
ohlasovateľ/c
Oldrich/c
Oliver/c
Ondrej/c
opatrovateľ/c
opočlovek/c
osloboditeľ/c
osnovateľ/c
ostrovan/c
osvojiteľ/c
otčim/c
otecko/c
overovateľ/c
oživovateľ/c
páchateľ/c
paleontológ/c
panáčik/c
pánboh/c
Pánbožko/c
Pankrác/c
Paraguajčan/c
Parížan/c
pastierik/c
páterko/c
Patrik/c
Pavel/c
Pécsan/c
pedagóg/c
pehánik/c
perohryz/c
Perún/c
Peter/c
piadimužíček/c
pisateľ/c
plačko/c
Plevňan/c
Plzenčan/c
poburovateľ/c
podkušiteľ/c
podnecovateľ/c
podporovateľ/c
pohan/c
pokračovateľ/c
politológ/c
Polynézan/c
pomológ/c
Portoričan/c
poručiteľ/c
poskytovateľ/c
poslík/c
posol/c
posudzovateľ/c
potomok/c
Považan/c
pozemšťan/c
pozorovateľ/c
požívateľ/c
praded/c
praobyvateľ/c
prarodič/c
Pražan/c
prednášateľ/c
predplatiteľ/c
prekladateľ/c
prenajímateľ/c
prenášateľ/c
Pretórijčan/c
prevádzkovateľ/c
priateľ/c
prihlasovateľ/c
princ/c
prispievateľ/c
prváčik/c
Pyrrhos/c
Qébečan/c
rádiológ/c
Radoslav/c
Radúz/c
Ramzes/c
rarášok/c
Remešan/c
Reykjavičan/c
Riazančan/c
Richard/c
Riječan/c
Riodejaneiran/c
Robert/c
rodič/c
rokovateľ/c
Roman/c
röntgenológ/c
rozširovateľ/c
ručiteľ/c
rusofil/c
Rwanďan/c
samouk/c
samozásobiteľ/c
Samuel/c
satyr/c
sebevrah/c
sedliačisko/c
Senčan/c
Sergej/c
severan/c
Sevillčan/c
Sicílčan/c
Silvester/c
Sizyfos/c
skrček/c
skúmateľ/c
Slavomír/c
slovakofil/c
smejko/c
sociológ/c
Sokoľčan/c
somatológ/c
spasiteľ/c
speleológ/c
spisovateľ/c
spojovateľ/c
spoludedič/c
spolumajiteľ/c
spoluobjaviteľ/c
spolupáchateľ/c
spolupredkladateľ/c
spoluručiteľ/c
spoluužívateľ/c
sporiteľ/c
spracovateľ/c
spracúvateľ/c
sprostáčisko/c
sraľo/c
starček/c
staviteľ/c
stomatológ/c
stratég/c
strýčko/c
stvárňovateľ/c
Stvoriteľ/c
súdruh/c
susedko/c
sváčko/c
svák/c
svat/c
svedok/c
Svetozár/c
synáčik/c
syn/c
šach/c
šaľo/c
Šarišan/c
šašo/c
šéfko/c
šerif/c
šíriteľ/c
širvánšach/c
školáčik/c
šľachtiteľ/c
špeh/c
Štajerčan/c
Štetínčan/c
Štokholmčan/c
štvrtáčik/c
šuhajíček/c
šuhajko/c
švagorko/c
Tallinčan/c
Tantalus/c
Tanzánijčan/c
tatko/c
tatuško/c
teatrológ/c
technológ/c
Teodor/c
tesť/c
textológ/c
Tchajwančan/c
Tibor/c
tiežpodnikateľ/c
Timotej/c
Togčan/c
Tomáš/c
Torunčan/c
Transylvánčan/c
Trenčan/c
Trnavčan/c
trtko/c
truľko/c
tučko/c
Turínčan/c
úbožiačik/c
ufológ/c
uchvatiteľ/c
ujec/c
ujo/c
upravovateľ/c
Urban/c
usporiadateľ/c
Užhorodčan/c
Václav/c
Valentín/c
valibuk/c
Vasil/c
Vavrinec/c
veliteľ/c
veľkopestovateľ/c
Vendelín/c
Vergílius/c
vesmírčan/c
vidiečan/c
Vientiančan/c
Viktor/c
Vilniusan/c
virológ/c
vkladateľ/c
Vladislav/c
vnuk/c
voliteľ/c
Vratko/c
vydražiteľ/c
vykonávateľ/c
vyrábateľ/c
vyvážateľ/c
Xenofón/c
Záhrebčan/c
Zambijčan/c
zasielateľ/c
zbeh/c
zeman/c
zhotovovateľ/c
Zlatko/c
zlosyn/c
znečisťovateľ/c
zotročovateľ/c
zvelebovateľ/c
žalobníček/c
židáčik/c
Žilinčan/c
